Massachusetts, session 194th, H2803.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, the Plymouth county retirement system shall credit David Osborne with creditable
service for the service he rendered for the Town of Norwell for the period of July 1, 2008 to the
present, inclusive, for the purpose of determining his superannuation retirement allowance
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws.
Before the date that any retirement allowance becomes effective in the case of David Osborne,
he shall pay into the annuity savings fund of the retirement system in one sum or installments,
upon such terms and conditions as the retirement system may prescribe, an amount equal to that
which would have been withheld as regular deductions from his regular compensation for such
previous service, or most recent portion thereof, as he may elect, had he been a member of the
of 2

Plymouth county retirement system during the period the service was rendered, plus regular
interest thereon. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2